South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4658.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-11-360(11) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (11) The installation, repair, or maintenance of signs, of billboards, or billboard structures; provided, however, an electrical license is required to perform a final connection to a branch circuit conductor. The installation or modification of a branch circuit conductor is not considered a part of the installation, repair, or maintenance of a sign, or billboard, or billboard structure. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----